South Dakota, session 2026, HB1260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-13:
The governing body of a municipality may, by ordinance, establish a program to
provide a property tax rebate to an owner of an owner-occupied single-family dwelling
situated within the municipality. Only taxes levied by the municipality may be rebated
under the program.
If a municipality establishes a program to provide a property tax rebate pursuant
to this section, the municipality must issue a rebate to any applicant who meets the criteria
provided in the ordinance.

26.229.14 2 1260
An Act to authorize the establishment of municipal property tax rebate programs.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1260
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1260 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1260 ENROLLED